Indiana, session 2026, HB1019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The amendment to
the Constitution of the State of Indiana concerning the residency
of a city or town court judge, agreed to by the One Hundred
Twenty-Third General Assembly (P.L.254-2023) and the One
Hundred Twenty-Fourth General Assembly (P.L.244-2025), shall
be submitted to the electors of Indiana at the 2026 general election
in the manner provided for the submission of constitutional
amendments under IC 3.
(b) Under Article 16, Section 1 of the Constitution of the State
of Indiana, which requires the general assembly to submit
constitutional amendments to the electors at the next general
election after the general assembly agrees to the amendment
referred to it by the last previously elected general assembly, and
in accordance with IC 3-10-3, the general assembly prescribes the
form in which the public question concerning the ratification of
this state constitutional amendment must appear on the 2026
general election ballot as follows:
"Public Question #1
Shall the Constitution of the State of Indiana be amended to
permit the judge of a city or town court to reside in: (1) the county
in which the court is located; or (2) the bordering county closest to
the city or town in which the court is located? (This question
HEA 1019

2
concerns Article 6, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of
Indiana.)".
HEA 1019

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1019